language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0572 Y 73
SFX 0572 0 ena .
SFX 0572 0 enaj .
SFX 0572 0 ene .
SFX 0572 0 eneho .
SFX 0572 0 enej .
SFX 0572 0 eneje .
SFX 0572 0 eneju .
SFX 0572 0 enemu .
SFX 0572 0 eni .
SFX 0572 0 enja .
SFX 0572 0 enjach .
SFX 0572 0 enjam .
SFX 0572 0 enje .
SFX 0572 0 enjemi .
SFX 0572 0 enjom .
SFX 0572 0 enjomaj .
SFX 0572 0 enjow .
SFX 0572 0 enju .
SFX 0572 0 enoh .
SFX 0572 0 enom .
SFX 0572 0 enu .
SFX 0572 0 eny .
SFX 0572 0 enych .
SFX 0572 0 enym .
SFX 0572 0 enymaj .
SFX 0572 0 enymi .
SFX 0572 0 eše .
SFX 0572 0 eštaj .
SFX 0572 0 eštej .
SFX 0572 0 ešće .
SFX 0572 0 i .
SFX 0572 0 icy .
SFX 0572 0 ili .
SFX 0572 0 imoj .
SFX 0572 0 imy .
SFX 0572 0 itaj .
SFX 0572 0 itej .
SFX 0572 0 ić .
SFX 0572 0 iće .
SFX 0572 0 ił .
SFX 0572 0 iła .
SFX 0572 0 iłe .
SFX 0572 0 iło .
SFX 0572 0 iłoj .
SFX 0572 0 iš .
SFX 0572 0 ja .
SFX 0572 0 jaca .
SFX 0572 0 jacaj .
SFX 0572 0 jace .
SFX 0572 0 jaceho .
SFX 0572 0 jacej .
SFX 0572 0 jaceje .
SFX 0572 0 jaceju .
SFX 0572 0 jacemu .
SFX 0572 0 jach .
SFX 0572 0 jachmoj .
SFX 0572 0 jachmy .
SFX 0572 0 jachu .
SFX 0572 0 jacoh .
SFX 0572 0 jacom .
SFX 0572 0 jacu .
SFX 0572 0 jacy .
SFX 0572 0 jacych .
SFX 0572 0 jacym .
SFX 0572 0 jacymaj .
SFX 0572 0 jacymi .
SFX 0572 0 jo .
SFX 0572 0 ju .
SFX 0572 0 moj .
SFX 0572 0 my .
SFX 0572 0 taj .
SFX 0572 0 tej .
SFX 0572 0 će .

SFX 0573 Y 65
SFX 0573 0 ch .
SFX 0573 0 chmoj .
SFX 0573 0 chmy .
SFX 0573 0 chu .
SFX 0573 0 dźa .
SFX 0573 0 dźana .
SFX 0573 0 dźanaj .
SFX 0573 0 dźane .
SFX 0573 0 dźaneho .
SFX 0573 0 dźanej .
SFX 0573 0 dźaneje .
SFX 0573 0 dźaneju .
SFX 0573 0 dźanemu .
SFX 0573 0 dźani .
SFX 0573 0 dźanoh .
SFX 0573 0 dźanom .
SFX 0573 0 dźanu .
SFX 0573 0 dźany .
SFX 0573 0 dźanych .
SFX 0573 0 dźanym .
SFX 0573 0 dźanymaj .
SFX 0573 0 dźanymi .
SFX 0573 0 dźawši .
SFX 0573 0 dźał .
SFX 0573 0 dźała .
SFX 0573 0 dźałe .
SFX 0573 0 dźało .
SFX 0573 0 dźałoj .
SFX 0573 0 dźeli .
SFX 0573 0 dźeni .
SFX 0573 0 dźenja .
SFX 0573 0 dźenjach .
SFX 0573 0 dźenjam .
SFX 0573 0 dźenje .
SFX 0573 0 dźenjemi .
SFX 0573 0 dźenjom .
SFX 0573 0 dźenjomaj .
SFX 0573 0 dźenjow .
SFX 0573 0 dźenju .
SFX 0573 0 dźeć .
SFX 0573 0 li .
SFX 0573 0 m .
SFX 0573 0 moj .
SFX 0573 0 my .
SFX 0573 0 s .
SFX 0573 0 smoj .
SFX 0573 0 smy .
SFX 0573 0 staj .
SFX 0573 0 stej .
SFX 0573 0 sće .
SFX 0573 0 z .
SFX 0573 0 zmoj .
SFX 0573 0 zmy .
SFX 0573 0 ztaj .
SFX 0573 0 ztej .
SFX 0573 0 zće .
SFX 0573 0 ł .
SFX 0573 0 ła .
SFX 0573 0 łe .
SFX 0573 0 ło .
SFX 0573 0 łoj .
SFX 0573 0 š .
SFX 0573 0 štaj .
SFX 0573 0 štej .
SFX 0573 0 šće .

SFX 0574 Y 12
SFX 0574 r ra .
SFX 0574 r rach .
SFX 0574 r raj .
SFX 0574 r ram .
SFX 0574 r rami .
SFX 0574 r rej .
SFX 0574 r rom .
SFX 0574 r romaj .
SFX 0574 r row .
SFX 0574 r ru .
SFX 0574 r ry .
SFX 0574 r ře .

SFX 0575 Y 15
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdniša .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdniše .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišeho .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišej .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišeje .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišeju .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišemu .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdniši .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišich .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišim .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišimaj .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišimi .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišoh .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišom .......
SFX 0575 ozdźišo ózdnišu .......

SFX 0576 Y 15
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdni .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnich .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnim .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnimaj .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnimi .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnja .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnje .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnjeho .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnjej .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnjeje .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnjeju .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnjemu .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnjoh .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnjom .....
SFX 0576 ozdźe ózdnju .....

SFX 0577 Y 32
SFX 0577 ozdźe ozdźišo .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdni .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnich .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnim .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnimaj .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnimi .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdniša .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdniše .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišeho .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišej .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišeje .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišeju .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišemu .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdniši .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišich .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišim .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišimaj .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišimi .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišoh .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišom .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnišu .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnja .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnje .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnjeho .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnjej .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnjeje .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnjeju .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnjemu .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnjo .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnjoh .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnjom .....
SFX 0577 ozdźe ózdnju .....

SFX 0578 Y 81
SFX 0578 0 a .
SFX 0578 0 aca .
SFX 0578 0 acaj .
SFX 0578 0 ace .
SFX 0578 0 aceho .
SFX 0578 0 acej .
SFX 0578 0 aceje .
SFX 0578 0 aceju .
SFX 0578 0 acemu .
SFX 0578 0 ach .
SFX 0578 0 achmoj .
SFX 0578 0 achmy .
SFX 0578 0 achu .
SFX 0578 0 acoh .
SFX 0578 0 acom .
SFX 0578 0 acu .
SFX 0578 0 acy .
SFX 0578 0 acych .
SFX 0578 0 acym .
SFX 0578 0 acymaj .
SFX 0578 0 acymi .
SFX 0578 0 ena .
SFX 0578 0 enaj .
SFX 0578 0 ene .
SFX 0578 0 eneho .
SFX 0578 0 enej .
SFX 0578 0 eneje .
SFX 0578 0 eneju .
SFX 0578 0 enemu .
SFX 0578 0 eni .
SFX 0578 0 enja .
SFX 0578 0 enjach .
SFX 0578 0 enjam .
SFX 0578 0 enje .
SFX 0578 0 enjemi .
SFX 0578 0 enjom .
SFX 0578 0 enjomaj .
SFX 0578 0 enjow .
SFX 0578 0 enju .
SFX 0578 0 enoh .
SFX 0578 0 enom .
SFX 0578 0 enu .
SFX 0578 0 eny .
SFX 0578 0 enych .
SFX 0578 0 enym .
SFX 0578 0 enymaj .
SFX 0578 0 enymi .
SFX 0578 0 eše .
SFX 0578 0 eštaj .
SFX 0578 0 eštej .
SFX 0578 0 ešće .
SFX 0578 0 i .
SFX 0578 0 ich .
SFX 0578 0 ichmoj .
SFX 0578 0 ichmy .
SFX 0578 0 ichu .
SFX 0578 0 icy .
SFX 0578 0 ili .
SFX 0578 0 imoj .
SFX 0578 0 imy .
SFX 0578 0 itaj .
SFX 0578 0 itej .
SFX 0578 0 iwši .
SFX 0578 0 ić .
SFX 0578 0 iće .
SFX 0578 0 ił .
SFX 0578 0 iła .
SFX 0578 0 iłe .
SFX 0578 0 iło .
SFX 0578 0 iłoj .
SFX 0578 0 iš .
SFX 0578 0 ištaj .
SFX 0578 0 ištej .
SFX 0578 0 išće .
SFX 0578 0 moj .
SFX 0578 0 my .
SFX 0578 0 o .
SFX 0578 0 taj .
SFX 0578 0 tej .
SFX 0578 0 u .
SFX 0578 0 će .

SFX 0579 Y 13
SFX 0579 c ca .
SFX 0579 c cach .
SFX 0579 c caj .
SFX 0579 c cam .
SFX 0579 c cami .
SFX 0579 c cej .
SFX 0579 c cojo .
SFX 0579 c com .
SFX 0579 c comaj .
SFX 0579 c cow .
SFX 0579 c cu .
SFX 0579 c cy .
SFX 0579 c če .

SFX 0580 Y 29
SFX 0580 ńša niša ...
SFX 0580 ńša niše ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišeho ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišej ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišeje ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišeju ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišemu ...
SFX 0580 ńša niši ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišich ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišim ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišimaj ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišimi ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišoh ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišom ...
SFX 0580 ńša nišu ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńše ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšeho ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšej ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšeje ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšeju ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšemu ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńši ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšich ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšim ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšimaj ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšimi ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšoh ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšom ...
SFX 0580 ńša ńšu ...
