language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.dic
arcywótc/0579
nadwótc/0579
najpozdźišo/0575
najprěńša/0580
nanajpozdźišo/0575
nanajprěńša/0580
njepotrjech/0572
njepowě/0573
njepraj/0578
njepředpowě/0573
njepředpraj/0578
njepřipowě/0573
njepřitrjech/0572
njetrjech/0572
njewobdźěl/0578
njezapowě/0573
njezasłuž/0578
potrjech/0572
powě/0573
powětr/0574
pozdźe/0577
praj/0578
prawótc/0579
předpowě/0573
předpraj/0578
přepozdźe/0576
připowě/0573
přitrjech/0572
trjech/0572
wobdźěl/0578
wótc/0579
zapowě/0573
zasłuž/0578
